incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="fæls/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ok__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oka</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okene</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økene</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oker</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øker</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oki</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="git/ter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tera</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teret</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teri</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ot__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtene</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oten</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øter</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abortiva__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drops__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="børstefot"><i>børstef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etterspørsel"><i>etterspørs</i><par n="fæls/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="genitalia"><i>genitalia</i><par n="abortiva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flyttefot"><i>flyttef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harefot"><i>haref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framfot"><i>framf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrefot"><i>dyref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feltfot"><i>feltf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bok"><i>b</i><par n="b/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fefot"><i>fef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drawback"><i>drawback</i><par n="bel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanefot"><i>hanef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gitter"><i>git</i><par n="git/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høgrefot"><i>høgref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fot"><i>f</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuglekvitter"><i>fuglekvit</i><par n="git/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godfot"><i>godf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="friarfot"><i>friarf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakfot"><i>bakf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fælsel"><i>fæls</i><par n="fæls/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drops"><i>drops</i><par n="drops__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bel"><i>bel</i><par n="bel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="griffelfot"><i>griffelf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gåsefot"><i>gåsef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glitter"><i>glit</i><par n="git/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flyttfot"><i>flyttf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="come-back"><i>come-back</i><par n="bel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comeback"><i>comeback</i><par n="bel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bladfot"><i>bladf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flitter"><i>flit</i><par n="git/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flatfot"><i>flatf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abortiva"><i>abortiva</i><par n="abortiva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnitter"><i>gnit</i><par n="git/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gripefot"><i>gripef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bordfot"><i>bordf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bjørnefot"><i>bjørnef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firefot"><i>firef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="h"><i>h</i><par n="h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frifot"><i>frif</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firfot"><i>firf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grytefot"><i>grytef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredsfot"><i>fredsf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
